Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2224
Bonds; sale; proceeds; appropriated to Highway Cash Fund or State Highway Capital Improvement Fund.

(1) The proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by subsection (1) of section 39-2223 are hereby appropriated to the Highway Cash Fund of the Department of Transportation, for the biennium ending June 30, 1977, for expenditure for the construction of highways.

(2) The proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by subsection (2) of section 39-2223 are hereby appropriated to the Highway Cash Fund of the Department of Transportation for expenditure for highway construction, resurfacing, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and restoration and for the elimination or alleviation of cash-flow problems resulting from the receipt of federal funds.

(3) The proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by subsection (3) of section 39-2223 are hereby appropriated to the State Highway Capital Improvement Fund of the Department of Transportation for use pursuant to the Build Nebraska Act.

Laws 1969, c. 314, § 2, p. 1132;

Laws 1975, LB 401, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 632, § 17;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 160;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 42.

Build Nebraska Act, see section 39-2701.